Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 1. Public Officers; General Provisions
§ 25-1-69.
Officer not to carry or deposit public funds outside state.

It shall be unlawful for any officer of this state, or for any officer of any county or any levee board in this state, to deposit, carry, send, or to permit to be deposited, carried, or sent to any point beyond the confines of this state any part of any fund, money, bonds, or securities of any kind whatever belonging to the State of Mississippi, or to any county or subdivision of any county within this state, which may have come into his possession or custody by virtue of his office, unless paid out by due and legal authority. Any state or county officer violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned in the state penitentiary for a term not exceeding five (5) years, or both, at the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3488; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2826; 1930, § 2913; 1942, § 4059; Laws, 1904, ch. 107.

§ 25-1-71.
Public moneys are trust funds.

All money deposited in a bank or with any depository by or for a tax collector or other officer having the custody of public funds, state, county, municipal, levee board, road districts, drainage districts, or school districts, whether the same be deposited in the name of the officer as an individual or as an officer or in the name of any other person, is prima facie public money and a trust fund, and is not liable to be taken by the general creditors of the officer or by the creditors of the depository. Whenever any corporation doing a banking business of whose property and banking business the banking examiner has taken possession as provided by law, it shall be the duty of such banking examiner, or his agent in charge, out of the first money coming into his hands to immediately pay to the tax collector or other officer having the custody of such funds the full amount thereof, as far as possible. On failure so to do, the chancery court of the county where said corporation was doing business, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, shall on ten (10) days’ notice require the payment of all, or such part thereof as is on hand, until the full amount due is paid. Nothing herein contained shall in any manner vary or affect the liability of such officer or his bondsmen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3077; 1906, § 3485; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2823; 1930, § 2914; 1942, § 4060; Laws, 1922, ch. 177.

§ 25-1-72.
Duty to deposit funds into county depository.

All county officers who receive funds payable into the county treasury shall deposit such funds into the county depository on the day when they are collected or on the next business day thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 13; Laws, 1986, ch. 305, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 27, 1986).

§ 25-1-73.
Officers liable for costs of collection of public funds improperly withheld.

Any officer, state, county, municipal, or district, or any other custodian of public funds or property who shall improperly withhold same from the state or county treasury or other authority whose duty it is to receive same, or who shall fail to turn property over to the proper custodian, or who shall in anywise be in default as to any money or property held by him as a public official in this state or in any other capacity as custodian of such funds or property which may come into his hands by virtue of his official position, whether in the proper performance of his official duties or otherwise, shall be liable on his bond for all costs of collection or recovery of money or property, including in such costs the commissions, if any, of the state tax commission or the attorney general, and all other costs connected therewith, including interest on funds improperly withheld for such time as such funds have been withheld, and reasonable rental and damages where property belonging to the public is so withheld. Any such public official who shall unlawfully pay any public funds to himself, or who shall knowingly and designedly pay such funds to any other person not entitled thereto without allowance regularly made by the proper authority, shall be liable on his official bond for all costs of recovery of such funds, including the commissions, if any, which may be due to the officer making the collection.

It is the purpose of this section to preserve in its entirety the public funds and property in this state; and it shall be so construed that the commissions, if any, and fees of the attorney general and the state tax commission, and all other costs of collection must be borne by such derelict official or custodian.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2915; 1942, § 4061; Laws, 1924, ch. 328; Laws, 1928, Ex ch. 90; Laws, 1962, ch. 588, § 18, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1964.

§ 25-1-75.
Duplicate receipt books upon transfer of funds.

All state boards, commissions, agencies, bureaus, and other departments of the State of Mississippi, and the governing authorities of all counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions shall maintain duplicate receipt books, showing the date and the amount of money received by said department or political subdivision from any other state department or political subdivision. Upon the distribution of any funds to any state department, agency, or political subdivision of the state, the distributing department or agency shall demand a receipt for said funds. The recipient of said funds shall execute said receipt and give to the disbursing agency or political subdivision the original thereof, and shall retain in a receipt book kept for that purpose a duplicate of said receipt, showing the amount received by said agency or political subdivision.

The receipt books provided in this section shall be of permanent type, shall be approved by the state auditor, and shall be a public record available for inspection during office hours by any citizen.

Any official, authorized to disburse or receive funds as contemplated hereby, who does not demand a receipt or keep a duplicate receipt as so contemplated shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-21; Laws, 1954, ch 386, §§ 1-3 [¶¶ 1-3]

§ 25-1-77.
Bureau of Fleet Management created; purpose; duties; purchase, rent, lease or acquisition of motor vehicle for state use; certain documentation required; bureau may seize and dispose of certain state agency vehicles; reports; retention of vehicles seized under forfeiture laws; exemption of state institution of higher learning.

There is created the Bureau of Fleet Management within the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, for the purposes of coordinating and promoting efficiency and economy in the purchase, lease, rental, acquisition, use, maintenance and disposal of vehicles by state agencies. The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may employ a Fleet Management Officer to manage the bureau and carry out its purposes. The bureau may employ other suitable and competent personnel as necessary. The bureau shall encourage the use of fuel efficient or hybrid vehicles appropriate for the state agency’s intended purpose and, when feasible, the use of alternative fuels or energy sources, including, but not limited to, ethanol, biodiesel, natural gas or electric power. The bureau shall prepare a fiscal analysis of the cost-effectiveness of using alternative fuel or energy source vehicles by state agencies, and submit a report of that fiscal analysis to the Legislature by December 15, 2009. Not later than July 1, 2014, at least seventy-five percent (75%) of all vehicles to which the bureau holds title in the name of the state must have a fuel economy estimate by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of forty (40) miles per gallon or higher for highway driving.

The Bureau of Fleet Management shall perform the following duties:

To hold title in the name of the State of Mississippi to all vehicles currently in possession of state agencies as defined in Section 25-9-107(d) and to assign vehicles to such agencies for use; however, the bureau shall exempt any agency or agency vehicles from the provisions of this paragraph (a) if it determines that state or federal law requires that title be vested only in the agency;

To establish rules and regulations for state agency use of vehicles;

To gather information and specify proper fleet management practices for state agencies;

To acquire fleet management software and require agencies to provide necessary information for the bureau to properly monitor the size, use, maintenance and disposal of the state’s fleet of vehicles; the bureau shall communicate regularly with the fleet managers of each state agency to determine strengths and weaknesses of the various fleet operations; the bureau shall disseminate information to the agencies so that each can take advantage of any beneficial practices being incorporated at other entities; the bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the mileage reimbursement practices of each state agency;

To carry out responsibilities relative to budget recommendations as provided in Section 27-103-129;

To reassign vehicles in the possession of any state agency if the bureau believes that another state agency can make more efficient use of a vehicle; however, except as otherwise provided in Section 51–11–101, the state agency receiving the reassigned vehicle shall pay to the previous agency’s special fund, or if no special fund exists to the State General Fund, the National Automobile Dealers Association (NADA) wholesale value for the vehicle or the estimated amount for which the vehicle would have sold at auction, as shall be determined by the bureau, whichever is less;

To investigate at any time the vehicle usage practices of any state agency; and

To require each agency to submit to the bureau a vehicle acquisition/use/disposal plan on an annual basis. From the plans received, the bureau shall evaluate the proposed plans and shall submit a recommendation to the Legislature prior to January 1 of each year.

No state department, institution or agency shall purchase, rent, lease or acquire any motor vehicle, regardless of the source of funds from which the motor vehicle is to be purchased, except under authority granted by the Department of Finance and Administration. The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the purchase, rental, lease or acquisition of any motor vehicle by a state department, institution or agency with regard to the appropriateness of the vehicle to its intended use. The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall only grant authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a motor vehicle which is the lowest cost vehicle to carry out its intended use. Before the disposal or sale of any vehicle, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall make a determination that the lifetime use and mileage of the vehicle has been maximized and that it would not be feasible for another state agency to use the vehicle.

The department, institution or agency shall maintain proper documentation which provides the intended use of the vehicle and the basis for choosing the vehicle. Such documentation shall show that the department, institution or agency made diligent efforts to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a vehicle that is the lowest cost vehicle for its intended use. Such documentation shall be updated as needed when the intended use of the vehicle or any other facts concerning the vehicle are changed. All such documentation shall be approved by the State Fleet Officer prior to purchase, rental, lease or acquisition or change in use of any vehicle and shall be maintained and made available for review by the State Auditor, any other reviewing agency and the Legislature. The Bureau of Fleet Management shall immediately notify the department head of any agency that has a vehicle found to be in violation of the bureau’s rules and regulations. At the same time, the bureau shall notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor of its findings regarding any such vehicle. If the violation is not rectified within five (5) days of the notice, then the bureau may seize the vehicle and dispose of it as the bureau deems to be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi.

On or before September 1 of each year, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall prepare and deliver to the Senate and House Appropriations Committees and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a report containing any irregularities that it finds concerning purchases of state-owned vehicles.

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may retain any vehicle seized pursuant to the forfeiture laws of this state, and the total number of vehicles assigned to each such agency shall not be reduced by the number of seized vehicles which the agency retains.

The Bureau of Fleet Management, upon request, shall grant an exemption from the provisions of this section for only any vehicle assigned to a sworn officer of the Department of Public Safety and used in undercover operations when the bureau determines that compliance could jeopardize the life, health or safety of the sworn officer.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any state institution of higher learning.

When making requests for authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire vehicles as provided in subsection (3) of this section, agencies shall submit the lowest cost vehicle possible to carry out its intended use. Any such request shall be in writing from the agency head, certifying the vehicle requested is the lowest cost option available and acknowledging that any request contrary to this provision shall subject the agency head to penalties as provided in Sections 25-1-91, 31-7-55 and 31-7-57, where applicable. The Bureau of Fleet Management shall only approve the lowest cost vehicle, which in its estimation, will carry out the intended use. No agency may purchase any vehicle that the Bureau of Fleet Management has disapproved as being a higher cost option.

No requests authorized under subsections (3) and (9) of this section shall be approved by the Bureau of Fleet Management if the requesting agency has not properly maintained in the fleet/asset reporting system all information required by the Bureau of Fleet Management. Agencies shall correct any inadequacies or discrepancies in the system noted by the Bureau of Fleet Management before the bureau may approve any requests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 347; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 12; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 166; Laws, 2001, ch. 561, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 409, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 6, eff from and after passage (March 15, 2018).

§ 25-1-78.
Moratorium on acquisition of motor vehicles by state agencies; reduction in total number of motor vehicles by certain agencies; exemptions.

For purposes of this section, the term “state agency” means any agency that is subject to oversight by the Bureau of Fleet Management of the Department of Finance and Administration under Section 25-1-77.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, beginning on July 1, 2017, through June 30, 2018, the Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall not approve the purchase, lease or acquisition of any motor vehicle by a state agency, regardless of the source of funds used. However, any agency that has a fleet of not more than fifty (50) vehicles may replace a vehicle that has been wrecked and deemed a total loss or any vehicle whose repair cost exceeds the cash value of the vehicle as determined by the Bureau of Fleet Management. Documentation of such loss or repair costs must be submitted to the Bureau of Fleet Management prior to replacement of the vehicle.

Beginning July 1, 2012, any state agency with a fleet of more than fifty (50) motor vehicles shall reduce the total number of its motor vehicles by two percent (2%) each fiscal year until June 30, 2016. The Bureau of Fleet Management and the State Auditor shall work together to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

The provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, with regard to the purchase, lease or acquisition of vehicles and to the mandatory reduction of the agency’s fleet of vehicles, shall not apply to:

A state agency’s law enforcement or emergency vehicles, upon demonstrating to the Bureau of Fleet Management a justifiable need to be excluded from the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

A state agency’s vehicles that are acquired by the use of grant monies that are specified to be used for that purpose and for which no state matching funds from the State General Fund are required, expended or used.

Vehicles of the Department of Child Protection Services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 409, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-1-79.
Use of state-owned automobiles.

It shall be unlawful for any officer, employee or other person whatsoever to use or permit or authorize the use of any automobile or any other motor vehicle owned by the State of Mississippi or any department, agency or institution thereof for any purpose other than upon the official business of the State of Mississippi or any agency, department or institution thereof. Further, it shall be unlawful for any such officer or employee to be paid or to receive any sums whatsoever for travel expense until the expenses for which payment is made, and each item thereof, have been actually incurred by such officer or employee, and then only upon the presentation of an itemized expense account which shall be approved in writing by the head of the department, agency or institution on whose behalf such travel is performed. However, it is expressly provided that any such officer or employee traveling on business for and in behalf of the State of Mississippi may, strictly in the discretion of an agency, institution or department head, receive in advance from state funds for the purpose of such travel expense a sum to be specified by such aforementioned superior. Further, strict account of any sum so advanced must be kept in accord with Section 25-1-81.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 25-1-81.
Expense accounts and reports as to state-owned automobiles.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall refuse to issue warrants upon requisitions drawn in violation of the provisions hereof, and where any expense account is allowed and paid in violation of the provisions of Sections 25-1-77 through 25-1-93, it shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration to withhold the payment of any further expense accounts for the department, agency or institution involved until the amount of the account or accounts illegally paid shall be refunded and repaid to the State of Mississippi by the person receiving or approving same. It is further provided that the Department of Finance and Administration shall prescribe and deliver to each agency, department or institution a uniform system of expense accounts herein allowed, including a uniform system of depreciation allowance. All expense accounts for lodging shall be supported by receipted bills showing the payment thereof by such officer or employee. It is incumbent upon each agency, department or institution to abide by and utilize the method of uniform system of expense accounts so prescribed and delivered by the Department of Finance and Administration. Each agency, department or institution, in rendering its annual report to the Bureau of Fleet Management and the Legislature, shall show the number of state-owned automobiles purchased and operated during the year, the number purchased and operated out of funds appropriated by the Legislature, the number purchased and operated out of any other public funds, the miles traveled per automobile, the total miles traveled, the average cost per mile, and depreciation estimate on each automobile. The report shall also show the cost per mile and total number of miles traveled in privately-owned automobiles for which reimbursement is made out of state funds and any other information requested by the Bureau of Fleet Management.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 25-1-83.
Attending conventions, associations, or meetings.

It is further provided that no funds appropriated by the Legislature or received by any agency, department, or institution from any source whatever shall be used in defraying the expenses of any state employee, other than an officer or department head, in attending a convention, association, or meeting, unless such employee be duly authorized by prior approval in writing of the departmental head or officer in charge of such department, agency, or institution in strict accord with Sections 25-1-79 and 25-1-81. Each department, agency, or institution in its annual report to the Legislature shall separately show each association, convention, or meeting attended by any of its employees, the purposes thereof, the names of the employees attending, and the total cost to the state of such convention, association, or meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 25-1-85.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2001, ch. 561, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 2001).

[Codes, 1942, § 4061-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 7; Laws, 1952, ch. 358; Laws, 1956, ch. 370; Laws, 1958, ch. 467; Laws, 1962, chs. 497, 498, § 10; Laws, 1964, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 649, § 17, 1968, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 559 § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 472; Laws, 1979, ch. 448; Laws, 1980, ch. 436; Laws, 1981, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 366, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 354, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 475; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 167; Laws, 1985, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 496; Laws, 1988, ch. 378; Laws, 1989, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 555, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 651, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 592, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 599, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000).]

§ 25-1-87.
Marking publicly owned or leased vehicle; exceptions; effect of noncompliance.

All motor vehicles owned or leased by the State of Mississippi or any agency, department or political subdivision thereof, which shall include counties and municipalities, when such agency or department or political subdivision, which shall include counties and municipalities, is supported wholly or in part by public taxes or by appropriations from public funds, shall have painted on both sides in letters at least three (3) inches in height, and on the rear in letters not less than one and one-half (11/2) inches in height, the name of the state agency or department, or political subdivision, which shall include counties and municipalities, in a color which is in contrast with the color of the vehicle; provided, however, that a permanent decal may be used in lieu of paint, and provided further, that any municipality may affix a permanent decal or design at least twelve (12) inches in height and twelve (12) inches in width on both sides of the vehicle with the name of the municipality within or across the permanent decal or design, and the permanent design or decal shall be in a color or colors which are in contrast with the color of the vehicle. No privilege license tag shall be issued for such vehicle until the name has been painted thereon or a permanent design or decal affixed thereto as required by this section. A permanent decal may be used in lieu of paint. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to vehicles used by the Chief Executive of the State of Mississippi, to vehicles owned or leased by the Department of Economic and Community Development, to vehicles owned or leased by the Office of the Attorney General, to not more than one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Department of Finance and Administration for use by the Capitol Police, to vehicles owned or leased by the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure and used only by the Investigative Division of the board, to one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Executive Director of the Department of Mental Health, to not more than one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Mississippi Division of Medicaid, to one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, to one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, to one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Commissioner of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, to not more than three (3) vehicles owned or leased by the Department of Corrections and used only by Community Services Division officers, to not more than one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Mississippi Department of Transportation and used only by an investigator employed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, to not more than two (2) vehicles owned or leased by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources, or to not more than one (1) vehicle owned or leased by the Mississippi State Tax Commission; and upon receipt of a written request from the State Adjutant General, the Commissioner of Public Safety, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Mississippi State Tax Commission, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Director of the Bureau of Narcotics, the Executive Officer of the Board of Pharmacy, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission, the State Auditor or a president or chancellor of a state institution of higher learning, the Governor may authorize the use of specified unmarked vehicles only in instances where such identifying marks will hinder official investigations, and the governing authorities of any municipality may authorize the use of specified, unmarked police vehicles when identifying marks would hinder official criminal investigations by the police. The written request or the order or resolution authorizing such shall contain the manufacturer’s serial number, the state inventory number, where applicable, and shall set forth why the vehicle should be exempt from the provisions of this paragraph. In the event the request is granted, the Governor shall furnish the State Department of Audit with a copy of his written authority for the use of the unmarked vehicles, or the governing authority, as the case may be, shall enter its order or resolution on the minutes and shall furnish the State Department of Audit with a certified copy of its order or resolution for the use of the unmarked police vehicle. The state property auditors of the State Department of Audit shall personally examine vehicles owned or leased by the State of Mississippi or any agency, department or commission thereof and report violations of the provisions of this paragraph to the State Auditor and the Chairman of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review. Any vehicle found to be in violation of this paragraph shall be reported immediately to the department head charged with such vehicle, and five (5) days shall be given for compliance; and if not complied with, such vehicles shall be impounded by the State Auditor until properly marked or exempted.

Upon notification to the State Tax Commission by the State Auditor that any municipality or political subdivision is not in compliance with this section, the State Tax Commission shall withhold any sales tax due for distribution to any such municipality and any excise tax on gasoline, diesel fuel, kerosene and oil due any such county and for any months thereafter, and shall continue to withhold such funds until compliance with this section is certified to the State Tax Commission by the State Department of Audit.

County-owned motor vehicles operated by the sheriff’s department shall not be subject to the provisions of this section, but shall be subject to the provisions of Section 19-25-15. County-owned motor vehicles operated by a family court established pursuant to Section 43-23-1 et seq., shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

State-owned or leased motor vehicles operated by the Department of Mental Health or by facilities operated by the Department of Mental Health and used for transporting patients living in group homes or alternative living arrangements shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Up to four (4) passenger automobiles owned or leased by economic development districts or economic development authorities shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

State-owned or leased motor vehicles operated by the Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau of the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and used to investigate livestock theft shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Up to three (3) motor vehicles owned or leased by the Pascagoula Municipal Separate School District for use by district security officers shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Up to three (3) motor vehicles owned or leased by the Department of Human Services for use only by the Program Integrity Division and the executive director shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Up to three (3) motor vehicles owned or leased by the Department of Insurance for use by the State Fire Marshal’s Office shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

The motor vehicles of a public airport shall not be subject to the provisions of this section upon a finding by the governing authority of such airport that marking a motor vehicle as required in this section will compromise security at such airport.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 7; Laws, 1952, ch. 358; Laws, 1956, ch. 370; Laws, 1958, ch. 467; Laws, 1962, chs. 497, 498, § 10; Laws, 1964, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 649, § 17; Laws, 1968, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 559, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 321; Laws, 1989, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 14; Laws, 1994, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 608, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 404, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 547, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 588, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 25-1-89.
Donated automobiles.

Any institution of higher learning may own and operate a passenger automobile donated to it for use in the work of such institution by an individual or individuals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 9; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 25-1-91.
Penalties regarding state-owned automobiles.

If any person shall knowingly and wilfully violate any of the provisions of Sections 25-1-77 through 25-1-93, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars and, in addition, shall be removed from the office or position which he holds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 10.

§ 25-1-93.
Provisions inapplicable to Governor.

It is herein expressly provided that no section, portion, or part of Sections 25-1-77 through 25-1-91 shall in any way be construed to apply to the Governor or to the governor’s office of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4061-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 448, § 11.

§ 25-1-95.
Signature machines.

The Governor, Secretary of State, State Auditor, and Treasurer, who, in performing their respective official duties, sign their official names as such officers to various and divers documents and instruments, are hereby authorized to use in signing said instruments and documents a standard signature machine that will reproduce a facsimile signature of each such officer which, under modern methods, gives more protection than using pen and ink. The signature machine to be used by the aforesaid officers under the provisions of this section shall be selected by the Governor, Attorney General and Secretary of State.

The instrument signed by the aforesaid officers of the State of Mississippi, who shall sign official instruments and documents with a signature machine under and by virtue of the provisions herein contained, shall be taken and accepted in all courts and otherwise with the same force, effect, and validity as though the said officer who signed same with said signature machine had signed such instrument or document with his own hand.

Each officer authorized by this section to use a signature machine shall safely keep his facsimile signature in such a way as to prevent the use thereof by persons not authorized so to do.

The Governor is hereby authorized to permit any other official of the state to use a signature machine of the kind selected by the Governor, Attorney General and Secretary of State, if the necessity therefor should arise. It shall be the duty of each of the officials authorized to use said signature machine to keep his facsimile signature secure, and such officer shall be liable personally and on his official bond for any loss caused by his negligence in failing to keep secure his said facsimile signature.

Any person unlawfully using any signature machine provided for in this section, without the consent or direction of the officer whose facsimile signature is being so used, shall be guilty of forgery and punishable upon conviction thereof as provided by law in such cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4065; Laws, 1938, ch. 160.

§ 25-1-97.
State office hours.

The capitol commission of the state is hereby authorized and empowered to fix the hours for the opening and closing of public offices of the state commensurate with the seasons of the year. The business hours of all of the state public offices, departments, boards, commissions, and agencies shall be uniform, and said offices shall be open for business eight (8) hours per day Monday through Friday of each week except state holidays, with the capitol commission to set the opening and closing hours by its order from time to time. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit any office, department, board, commission, or agency to conduct essential business outside of the regular business day hours where the executive head or governing body deems it necessary. For any state holiday fixed under Section 3-3-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, falling on a Saturday or Sunday, the following Monday may, in the discretion of the executive head or governing body of a state agency, be utilized in lieu of the legal holiday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 542, § 9, eff from and after 10 days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 25-1-98.
Opening and staffing of state offices; legal holidays, construction of “workday.”

In addition to any other times required by statute, all state offices shall be open and staffed for the normal conduct of business from 8:00 a.m. until 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday, except on legal holidays as set forth in Section 3-3-7. The Governor may designate certain state offices and institutions as providers of essential services and require that they be open and staffed on legal holidays. The Board of Directors of the Mississippi Industries for the Blind may, in its discretion, require that its offices and operations be open and staffed on legal holidays. Employees required to work on legal holidays shall earn compensatory leave under the provisions of Section 25-3-92. No employee shall receive additional vacation or sick leave benefits for working on a legal holiday, nor shall this section be construed to authorize any additional compensation as an alternative to the accrual of compensatory leave except as specifically provided for in a legislative appropriation. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the hours of operation of any agency or to abrogate any action taken during hours other than those stated, nor shall these provisions apply to any offices that do not customarily stay open five (5) days a week. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the military department of the State of Mississippi or to the armories, field training sites, air bases or other installations of the Mississippi National Guard.

A workday for a state employee in a full-time employment position shall be eight (8) hours in duration at a minimum exclusive of time off for meals. The appointing authority shall develop work schedules which ensure that each full-time employee works a full workday and shall provide the State Auditor with a copy of the regular work schedule of the appointing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 574, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.